Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.515.310

Certain losses to permanent common school fund or other state educational funds as funded debt against state.

All losses to the permanent common school or any other state educational fund, which shall be occasioned by defalcation, mismanagement or fraud of the agents or officers controlling or managing the same, shall be audited by the proper authorities of the state. The amount so audited shall be a permanent funded debt against the state in favor of the particular fund sustaining such loss, upon which not less than six percent annual interest shall be paid.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.40.020. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 321 s 2; RRS s 4933; prior: 1897 c 118 s 110, part; 1890 p 373 s 51, part. Formerly RCW 28A.40.020, 28.40.020.]